Utah statutes.
76-5b-201.   Sexual exploitation of a minor -- Offenses.

(1)  A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a minor:

(a)  when the person:

(i)  knowingly produces, possesses, or possesses with intent to distribute child pornography; or

(ii)  intentionally distributes or views child pornography; or

(b)  if the person is a minor's parent or legal guardian and knowingly consents to or permits the minor to be sexually exploited as described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  Sexual exploitation of a minor is a second degree felony.

(3)  It is a separate offense under this section:

(a)  for each minor depicted in the child pornography; and

(b)  for each time the same minor is depicted in different child pornography.

(4)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section that no person under 18 years of age was actually depicted in the visual depiction or used in producing or advertising the visual depiction.

(5)  In proving a violation of this section in relation to an identifiable minor, proof of the actual identity of the identifiable minor is not required.

(6)  This section may not be construed to impose criminal or civil liability on:

(a)  any entity or an employee, director, officer, or agent of an entity when acting within the scope of employment, for the good faith performance of:

(i)  reporting or data preservation duties required under any federal or state law; or

(ii)  implementing a policy of attempting to prevent the presence of child pornography on any tangible or intangible property, or of detecting and reporting the presence of child pornography on the property; or

(b)  any law enforcement officer acting within the scope of a criminal investigation.

